Hawaii statutes.
§39-3 Allotments; appropriations.
Whenever the issuance of bonds has been authorized by an act of the
legislature, the bonds may be issued, sold, and delivered prior to or after any
allotments have been made by the governor for the purposes to be financed by
the issuance of the bonds. If any appropriation or any expenditure under an
appropriation made in an act of the legislature is conditioned, qualified, or
dependent as to effectiveness or amount or otherwise upon the performance,
happening, or existence of any act, occurrence, or event, bonds authorized by
an act or acts of the legislature to finance all or a portion of such an
appropriation may be issued prior to or after the time when all or any part of
the appropriation becomes effective or the expenditure can be made and prior to
or after the performance, happening, or existence of the act, occurrence, or
event; provided however that the proceeds of the bonds may not be applied to
any purpose or project requiring an allotment by operation of law until an
allotment has been made, or be applied to any appropriation or any expenditure
under an appropriation which has been conditioned, qualified, or made dependent
as to effectiveness or amount or otherwise upon the performance, happening, or
existence of any act, occurrence, or event until the appropriation becomes
effective or the expenditure can be made, or be applied to any appropriation or
any expenditure under an appropriation in excess of the amount of the
appropriation or prior to the time when the appropriation becomes effective.
The provisions of this section shall not permit the issuance of bonds to
finance any appropriation which has theretofore lapsed by operation of law. [L
1988, c 28, pt of §3]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next